Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Disaster and Emergency Services

39.400.
Necessity for and purpose of provisions for disaster and emergency response. [Repealed.]

39.401.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

39.402.
Division of Civil Defense created. [Repealed.]

39.403.
Adjutant General to serve as director; duties. [Repealed.]

39.404.
Personnel. [Repealed.]

39.405.
Office space and materials. [Repealed.]

39.406.
Public defense advisory council — Duties. [Repealed.]

39.407.
Powers of adjutant general. [Repealed.]

39.408.
Executive orders. [Repealed.]

39.409.
Emergency powers of Governor, mayors, and county judges/executive. [Repealed.]

39.410.
Compensation for property taken for temporary use — Notice to owner of property where title is taken. [Repealed.]

39.411.
Board of Claims to fix compensation if amount is in dispute. [Repealed.]

39.412.
Appeal from award of Board of Claims. [Repealed.]

39.413.
Procedure for payment of compensation. [Repealed.]

39.414.
Local mutual aid arrangements — Assistance in negotiation of reciprocal agreements with adjoining states or their political subdivisions. [Repealed.]

39.415.
Local government to establish organizations — Functions — Areawide organizations — Director, term, qualifications, duties, salary. [Repealed.]

39.416.
Disaster and emergency response powers of counties, urban-county governments, and cities. [Repealed.]

39.417.
Powers of county, metropolitan government, and city employees. [Repealed.]

39.418.
Reimbursement for loss, damage or expense — Notice of claim — Reimbursement where aid rendered outside state. [Repealed.]

39.419.
Owners of real estate used for sheltering persons not civilly liable for death, injury, loss or damage. [Repealed.]

39.420.
Mobile support units; commanders. [Repealed.]

39.421.
Personnel of mobile support units, powers, duties, compensation; reimbursement of county or city by state for compensation and expenses of employes. [Repealed.]

39.422.
Reimbursement of other state for mobile support personnel furnished; mobile support unit personnel not to operate in other state without reciprocity of provision for reimbursement. [Repealed.]

39.423.
Investigative powers of Governor — Subpoena. [Repealed.]

39.424.
Traffic control plans — Executive orders. [Repealed.]

39.425.
Powers of Governor concerning lease or loan of state property and permitting state employees to engage in disaster and emergency response activities — Permission for judicial and legislative employees. [Repealed.]

39.426.
Powers of political subdivision to contract with state for lease or loan of property. [Repealed.]

39.427.
Orders, rules and regulations. [Repealed.]

39.428.
Nonliability of state, its political subdivisions, agents or representatives for injury or property damage — Nonliability for death or injury resulting from blackout or other precautionary measures. [Repealed.]

39.429.
Power of arrest for violation of orders, rules or regulations. [Repealed.]

39.430.
Authority to receive services, equipment, supplies, materials and funds from federal government. [Repealed.]

39.431.
Political activity forbidden. [Repealed.]

39.432.
Qualifications and oath of persons connected with disaster and emergency response organizations. [Repealed.]

39.433.
Exemption from liability. [Repealed.]

39.445.
Rescue squads. [Renumbered.]

39.450.
Authority to execute Interstate Emergency Management and Disaster Compact. [Repealed.]

39.460.
Governor’s actions under compact. [Repealed.]

39.470.
Policy for disaster and emergency services organizations. [Repealed.]